public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.aff
SFX A ar iven/J [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar iven/J [nsv]edar
SFX A ar iven/J [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar iven/J [op]ar
SFX A ar iven/J [ox]longar
SFX A ar iven/J [pt]resar
SFX A ar iven/J [pt]rotar
SFX A ar iven/J [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar iven/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar iven/J [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar iven/J [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar iven/J [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar iven/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar iven/J ^alienar
SFX A ar iven/J ^bersajar
SFX A ar iven/J ^bordeđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^deramar
SFX A ar iven/J ^derivar
SFX A ar iven/J ^derobar
SFX A ar iven/J ^derokar
SFX A ar iven/J ^derotar
SFX A ar iven/J ^devorar
SFX A ar iven/J ^dexeredar
SFX A ar iven/J ^dexverxenar
SFX A ar iven/J ^exerŧitar
SFX A ar iven/J ^fermentar
SFX A ar iven/J ^guernar
SFX A ar iven/J ^inbaretar
SFX A ar iven/J ^infervorar
SFX A ar iven/J ^inkartonar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interesar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interkalar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interkuerar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interkuirar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interlinear
SFX A ar iven/J ^intermeđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interogar
SFX A ar iven/J ^interpretar
SFX A ar iven/J ^inŧercelar
SFX A ar iven/J ^kalefar
SFX A ar iven/J ^kriolar
SFX A ar iven/J ^lustrar
SFX A ar iven/J ^maravejar
SFX A ar iven/J ^merkantar
SFX A ar iven/J ^merkantiđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^ormeđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perfumar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perifraxar
SFX A ar iven/J ^periodar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perkolar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perkotar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perlustrar
SFX A ar iven/J ^permudarar
SFX A ar iven/J ^permutar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perorar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perpetrar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perpetuar
SFX A ar iven/J ^perseguitar
SFX A ar iven/J ^personaliđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^persugar
SFX A ar iven/J ^raxar
SFX A ar iven/J ^robar
SFX A ar iven/J ^roersar
SFX A ar iven/J ^sajar
SFX A ar iven/J ^scantiđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^skortegar
SFX A ar iven/J ^sotolinear
SFX A ar iven/J ^spergoŧar
SFX A ar iven/J ^sperimentar
SFX A ar iven/J ^sperlongar
SFX A ar iven/J ^spernacar
SFX A ar iven/J ^sperđurar
SFX A ar iven/J ^steriliđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^terapienar
SFX A ar iven/J ^teraŧar
SFX A ar iven/J ^termenar
SFX A ar iven/J ^terŧariolar
SFX A ar iven/J ^tormentar
SFX A ar iven/J ^verdeđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^vergiđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^verifegar
SFX A ar iven/J ^verolar
SFX A ar iven/J ^verxurar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xberlefar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xberlotar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xberlumar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xberxelar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xermojar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xgoñar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xlargiđar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xmerejar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xmorgolar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xnervađar
SFX A ar iven/J ^xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar iven/J alar
SFX A ar iven/J amar
SFX A ar iven/J arar
SFX A ar iven/J bertonar
SFX A ar iven/J dar
SFX A ar iven/J derenar
SFX A ar iven/J donar
SFX A ar iven/J far
SFX A ar iven/J fumar
SFX A ar iven/J kalar
SFX A ar iven/J kantar
SFX A ar iven/J kolar
SFX A ar iven/J korniđar
SFX A ar iven/J kurvar
SFX A ar iven/J lotar
SFX A ar iven/J lumar
SFX A ar iven/J menar
SFX A ar iven/J meravejar
SFX A ar iven/J međar
SFX A ar iven/J mojar
SFX A ar iven/J mudarar
SFX A ar iven/J ojar
SFX A ar iven/J okar
SFX A ar iven/J perdonar
SFX A ar iven/J perletar
SFX A ar iven/J pertegar
SFX A ar iven/J pongar
SFX A ar iven/J rajar
SFX A ar iven/J ramar
SFX A ar iven/J redar
SFX A ar iven/J rigolar
SFX A ar iven/J rivar
SFX A ar iven/J rolar
SFX A ar iven/J seguitar
SFX A ar iven/J serajar
SFX A ar iven/J speronar
SFX A ar iven/J sugar
SFX A ar iven/J terminar
SFX A ar iven/J tonar
SFX A ar iven/J tuar
SFX A ar iven/J vejar
SFX A ar iven/J velar
SFX A ar iven/J vergoñar
SFX A ar iven/J verigolar
SFX A ar iven/J versar
SFX A ar iven/J verđelar
SFX A ar iven/J xelar
SFX A ar iven/J xmerdar
SFX A ar iven/J đurar
SFX A ar iven/J ŧercar
SFX A ar iven/J ŧitar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [abik]rokar
SFX A ar ivion/J [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar ivion/J [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeio]strar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aelo]var
SFX A ar ivion/J [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar ivion/J [agot]rejar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ai]erar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ail]gar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ailu]minar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar ivion/J [als]tar
SFX A ar ivion/J [an]deđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [an]fraxar
SFX A ar ivion/J [an]kuerar
SFX A ar ivion/J [an]kuirar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ano]fegar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]niđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rcar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rdar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rkar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rnar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ao]rsar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aou]rbar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aou]rgar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aou]rlar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aou]rtar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [aux]nar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar ivion/J [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar ivion/J [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bou]rogar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bp]erlar
SFX A ar ivion/J [btv]ergar
SFX A ar ivion/J [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar ivion/J [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar ivion/J [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dg]obar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar ivion/J [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar ivion/J [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [eilox]mar
SFX A ar ivion/J [einoru]xar
SFX A ar ivion/J [einosu]car
SFX A ar ivion/J [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar ivion/J [eo]liđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [es]kotar
SFX A ar ivion/J [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar ivion/J [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar ivion/J [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar ivion/J [fm]eretar
SFX A ar ivion/J [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar ivion/J [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar ivion/J [gin]ritar
SFX A ar ivion/J [iln]trar
SFX A ar ivion/J [inru]jar
SFX A ar ivion/J [io]ntar
SFX A ar ivion/J [io]rkolar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ipu]lar
SFX A ar ivion/J [irst]umar
SFX A ar ivion/J [klt]ivar
SFX A ar ivion/J [kp]avejar
SFX A ar ivion/J [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ln]etrar
SFX A ar ivion/J [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar ivion/J [mp]eritar
SFX A ar ivion/J [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ns]erbar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ns]ervar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar ivion/J [nsv]edar
SFX A ar ivion/J [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar ivion/J [op]ar
SFX A ar ivion/J [ox]longar
SFX A ar ivion/J [pt]resar
SFX A ar ivion/J [pt]rotar
SFX A ar ivion/J [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar ivion/J [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar ivion/J [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar ivion/J [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^alienar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^bersajar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^bordeđar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^deramar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^derivar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^derobar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^derokar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^derotar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^devorar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^dexeredar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^dexverxenar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^exerŧitar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^fermentar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^guernar
SFX A ar ivion/J ^inbaretar
