public_html/app/tools/spellchecker/dictionaries/vec.dic
inagrir/A
albiđar/A
inalokar/A
dexinamorar/A
dexanemar/A
arar/A
arđinar/A
arsar/A
subastar/A
aŧetar/A
exautorar/A
inaxiar/A
badinar/A
xbajar/A
inbakukar/A
inbalbar/A
xbalonar/A
rebaltar/A
dexbandir/A
banketar/A
barakar/A
inbarboɉar/A
inbarlukar/A
xbasar/A
inbàter/A
xbatocar/A
dexbautar/A
baxar/A
bekar/A
dexbendar/A
bersajar/A
inbéver/A
xbiakar/A
biasugar/A
xbimar/A
xbingolar/A
subisar/A
inbixakar/A
dexbocar/A
xbóɉer/A
xbokar/A
inboloñar/A
inbonar/A
inbonbegar/A
boraskar/A
borondolar/A
inboskaɉar/A
inbotonar/A
inbovolar/A
dexbragesar/A
dexbramegar/A
xbrasar/A
xbraŧolar/A
abreviar/A
xbrindolar/A
brojar/A
xbrokar/A
inbronkar/A
brunir/A
budelar/A
inbugar/A
skonbusolar/A
xbuxar/A
xbuxolar/A
scapinar/A
descavar/A
scentrar/A
ocèñer/A
intracéñer/A
incetar/A
cincinar/A
scoketar/A
dir/A
redir/A
daŧiar/A
indemoniar/A
depénxer/A
indevenar/A
dindolar/A
dixdíxer/A
dobar/A
adolorar/A
predomenar/A
dexdopiar/A
indormir/A
indotar/A
driŧar/A
dúxer/A
inđalar/A
đenerar/A
ađónxer/A
đugar/A
ebraiđar/A
ekuivokar/A
entrar/A
riesir/A
evínŧer/A
exekrar/A
asuefar/A
refar/A
fadar/A
sfakinar/A
kontrafaliar/A
fanfruñar/A
sfantar/A
infastidir/A
faŧendar/A
bonifegar/A
mañifegar/A
sofegar/A
femenar/A
defenestrar/A
inferar/A
fermar/A
fetar/A
dexinfiar/A
infiankir/A
infiaskar/A
infidar/A
rafigurar/A
strafilar/A
rafinar/A
fiolar/A
fioŧinar/A
fiscotar/A
subafitar/A
foderar/A
infogar/A
desfoɉar/A
fondar/A
traforar/A
formar/A
informigar/A
raforŧar/A
infóter/A
frankar/A
infrànđer/A
fraskeđar/A
fraudar/A
sfredir/A
sfritegar/A
fruñolar/A
sfumar/A
sfuregar/A
fuxir/A
ingaletar/A
xgangerar/A
ingarbuɉar/A
gavasar/A
ingobar/A
dexgorgar/A
xgrameñar/A
dexgrankir/A
dexagravar/A
ingretolir/A
dexgritolir/A
ingrosir/A
xguainar/A
xguindolar/A
idroxenar/A
infioketar/A
reinproverar/A
intrar/A
iŧar/A
xɉavetar/A
ɉoŧar/A
skadenar/A
skaldar/A
kalomar/A
kamufar/A
kànđer/A
skansar/A
kaparar/A
deskapuɉar/A
skargar/A
deskartar/A
kasegar/A
skataronar/A
prekaŧar/A
skavalkar/A
esklúder/A
koɉonar/A
kolorar/A
inkomenŧiar/A
skonéter/A
skonpañar/A
skontentar/A
kòñer/A
deskoraɉir/A
korèxer/A
inkosar/A
kovèrđer/A
kréser/A
krokolar/A
inkroxar/A
inkucar/A
inkuirar/A
kuñir/A
inkuŧolar/A
xlanguir/A
lasar/A
xlavinar/A
lemoxinar/A
aleviar/A
likar/A
xliŧegar/A
dexloɉar/A
prelúder/A
stralúxer/A
dexmagrar/A
xmanarar/A
manifestar/A
xmaraŧar/A
martiriđar/A
maskerar/A
stramaŧar/A
frameđar/A
menaŧar/A
ixmerdar/A
konprométer/A
migrar/A
misiar/A
xmokaɉar/A
mondar/A
demoraliđar/A
inmorsar/A
moxegar/A
mufir/A
mustacar/A
nanir/A
dexnaxolar/A
nikiar/A
renonŧiar/A
ñaolar/A
odorar/A
oltrigar/A
oparar/A
inorkar/A
ostiar/A
padriđar/A
inpaketar/A
palpeđar/A
inpanocar/A
desparir/A
parlar/A
pasar/A
inpastiđar/A
inpatriarkar/A
skonpaxenar/A
spelar/A
pénder/A
pensar/A
deperir/A
spertegar/A
petenar/A
peverar/A
pianđotar/A
despikar/A
despionbar/A
pisar/A
pixokar/A
polejar/A
póner/A
sotopóner/A
sponteđar/A
spopolar/A
postar/A
depoxitar/A
prestar/A
reprímer/A
proviđar/A
deputar/A
ràder/A
ramar/A
ranŧinar/A
realiđar/A
remar/A
rexíster/A
dexriŧolar/A
roesar/A
ronbar/A
rosiđar/A
rufianar/A
ruviɉar/A
saketar/A
salmastrar/A
sanguenar/A
strasaver/A
scopetar/A
rasekurar/A
perseguitar/A
inselvadigir/A
malsentir/A
seraɉar/A
sevitar/A
presidiar/A
insiñir/A
skalinar/A
skarpinar/A
skermar/A
skorlar/A
reskríver/A
solar/A
asòlver/A
sòrber/A
spalmar/A
inspear/A
respetar/A
spionar/A
sporkar/A
kontrastar/A
starnudar/A
staxonar/A
stimar/A
stivalar/A
destrakar/A
strepitar/A
dexostruir/A
stuđar/A
sufitar/A
supiar/A
tafiar/A
destakar/A
intanbuxar/A
tarifar/A
destavelar/A
inténder/A
stenperar/A
reténxer/A
detèñer/A
otéñer/A
interŧar/A
tinbrar/A
tocar/A
toniđar/A
tormentar/A
tòser/A
trabakar/A
trankuilar/A
trateđar/A
tremolar/A
destrigolar/A
troñar/A
turbiar/A
ŧaratanar/A
konŧentrar/A
inŧèrner/A
inŧiganar/A
ŧirkondar/A
inŧukar/A
urteđar/A
vagabondar/A
xvanpir/A
travaxar/A
xvejar/A
vendemar/A
deskonveñir/A
intervèñer/A
vergiđar/A
malversar/A
investir/A
divíder/A
dexviscar/A
revixionar/A
xvolar/A
invòlxer/A
rexarsir/A
xbringar/A
dixerir/A
xlakar/A
xolar/A
